Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.020

Agent license requirements.

An applicant must meet the following minimum requirements to obtain a bail bond agent license:

(1) Be at least eighteen years of age;

(2) Not have been convicted of a crime in any jurisdiction in the preceding ten years, if the director determines that the applicant's particular crime directly relates to a capacity to perform the duties of a bail bond agent and the director determines that the license should be withheld to protect the citizens of Washington state. If the director shall make a determination to withhold a license because of previous convictions, the determination shall be consistent with the restoration of employment rights act, chapter 9.96A RCW;

(3) Be employed by a bail bond agency or be licensed as a bail bond agency; and

(4) Pay the required fee.

[ 2024 c 50 s 7; 1993 c 260 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 50: See note following RCW 18.415.010.